Hawaii statutes.
§449-10 Suit on bond. The
commissioner, or any person claiming to have sustained damage by reason of the
failure of the escrow depository to comply with its bond, may bring an action
on the bond to recover the damage therefrom. The commissioner may deposit with
a court of competent jurisdiction all or any part of the sum of the bond. [L
1967, c 144, pt of §1; HRS §449-10; am L 1985, c 269, §50; am L 1992, c 205,
§11]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next